Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,131
Effect of domestication.

(MBCA 9.24) (a) When
a domestication becomes effective:

(1) The title to all
real and personal property, both tangible and intangible, of the corporation
remains in the corporation without reversion or impairment;

(2) The liabilities of
the corporation remain the liabilities of the corporation;

(3) An action or proceeding
pending against the corporation continues against the corporation as if the
domestication had not occurred;

(4) The articles of domestication, or the articles
of incorporation attached to the articles of domestication, constitute the
articles of incorporation of a foreign corporation domesticating in this state;

(5) The shares of the
corporation are reclassified into shares, other securities, obligations, rights
to acquire shares or other securities, or into cash or other property in accordance
with the terms of the domestication, and the shareholders are entitled only
to the rights provided by those terms and to any appraisal rights they may
have under the organic law of the domesticating corporation; and

(6) The corporation is
deemed to:

(i)
Be incorporated under and subject to the organic law of the domesticated corporation
for all purposes;

(ii)
Be the same corporation without interruption as the domesticating corporation;
and

(iii)
Have been incorporated on the date the domesticating corporation was originally
incorporated.

(b)
When a domestication of a domestic business corporation in a foreign jurisdiction
becomes effective, the foreign business corporation is deemed to agree that
it will promptly pay the amount, if any, to which such shareholders are entitled
under sections 21-2,171 to 21-2,183.

(c) The owner liability of a shareholder in a foreign
corporation that is domesticated in this state shall be as follows:

(1) The domestication
does not discharge any owner liability under the laws of the foreign jurisdiction
to the extent any such owner liability arose before the effective time of
the articles of domestication;

(2) The shareholder shall not have owner liability
under the laws of the foreign jurisdiction for any debt, obligation, or liability
of the corporation that arises after the effective time of the articles of
domestication;

(3)
The provisions of the laws of the foreign jurisdiction shall continue to apply
to the collection or discharge of any owner liability preserved by subdivision
(1) of this subsection, as if the domestication had not occurred; and

(4) The shareholder shall
have whatever rights of contribution from other shareholders are provided
by the laws of the foreign jurisdiction with respect to any owner liability
preserved by subdivision (1) of this subsection, if the domestication had
not occurred.

(d)
A shareholder who becomes subject to owner liability for some or all of the
debts, obligations, or liabilities of the corporation as a result of its domestication
in this state shall have owner liability only for those debts, obligations,
or liabilities of the corporation that arise after the effective time of the
articles of domestication.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 131.